src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/verb-odd_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each verb:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Odd syllable verbs belonging to COASKKIT_IV, MUITAL_TV, MUITTASJ_TV, ALIST_IV, BEAGASJ_IV, HURAI_IV, LASSAN_IV, GEAGAT_TV

Tests:
  Verb - dálvvadit: # COASKKIT_IV
    dálvvadit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: dálvvada
    dálvvadit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: dálvvadii
    dálvvadit+V+IV+Imprt+Sg3: dálvvadehkos
    dálvvadit+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Sg3: dálvvadivččii
    dálvvadit+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [dálvvadeš, dálvvadeaš, dálvvadeažžá]
    dálvvadit+V+IV+Ger: dálvvadettiin
    dálvvadit+V+IV+PrfPrc: dálvvadan
    dálvvadit+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Inf: dálvvaduvvot
    dálvvadit+V+IV+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: dálvvadišgođii
    dálvvadit+V+IV+Der/alla+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: dálvvadalai
    dálvvadit+V+IV+Der/easti+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: dálvvadeastá
    dálvvadit+V+IV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Loc: [dálvvadeames, dálvvadeamis]

  Verb - duippidit: # MUITAL_TV
#    duippidit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: duippidan
    duippidit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: duippida
    duippidit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: duippidit
    duippidit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: duippideigga
#    duippidit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: duippideiddet
    duippidit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [duippide, duippidedje]
#    duippidit+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: duippit
#    duippidit+V+TV+Imprt+Pl3: duippidehkoset
#    duippidit+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Du1: duippidivččiime
    duippidit+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Pl3: duippidivčče
    duippidit+V+TV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [duippideš, duippideaš, duippideažžá]
    duippidit+V+TV+Pot+Prs+Pl3: duippidežžet
    duippidit+V+TV+Ger: duippidettiin
    duippidit+V+TV+PrfPrc: duippidan
    duippidit+V+TV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Inf: duippiduvvot
#    duippidit+V+TV+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: duippidišgohten
#    duippidit+V+TV+Der/easti+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: duippidesttiiga
    duippidit+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Loc: [duippideamis, duippideames]

  Verb - bisttašit: # MUITTASJ_TV
#    bisttašit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: bisttašan
    bisttašit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: bisttaša
    bisttašit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: bisttašit
    bisttašit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: bisttašeigga
#    bisttašit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: bisttašeiddet
    bisttašit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [bisttaše, bisttašedje]
#    bisttašit+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: bisttaš
#    bisttašit+V+TV+Imprt+Pl3: bisttašehkoset
#    bisttašit+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Du1: bisttašivččiime
    bisttašit+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Pl3: bisttašivčče
    bisttašit+V+TV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [bisttašeš, bisttašeaš, bisttašeažžá]
    bisttašit+V+TV+Pot+Prs+Pl3: bisttašežžet
    bisttašit+V+TV+Ger: bisttašettiin
    bisttašit+V+TV+PrfPrc: bisttašan
    bisttašit+V+TV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Inf: bisttašuvvot
#    bisttašit+V+TV+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: bisttašišgohten
    bisttašit+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Loc: [bisttašeamis, bisttašeames]

  Verb - huobastit: # ALIST_IV
#    huobastit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: huobastan
    huobastit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huobasta
    huobastit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: huobastit
    huobastit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: huobasteigga
#    huobastit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: huobasteiddet
    huobastit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [huobaste, huobastedje]
#    huobastit+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: huobas
#    huobastit+V+IV+Imprt+Pl3: huobastehkoset
#    huobastit+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Du1: huobastivččiime
    huobastit+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Pl3: huobastivčče
    huobastit+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [huobasteš, huobasteaš, huobasteažžá]
    huobastit+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Pl3: huobastežžet
    huobastit+V+IV+Ger: huobastettiin
    huobastit+V+IV+PrfPrc: huobastan
    huobastit+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Inf: huobastuvvot
#    huobastit+V+IV+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: huobastišgohten
#    huobastit+V+IV+Der/easti+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: huobastesttiiga
    huobastit+V+IV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Loc: [huobasteamis, huobasteames]

  Verb - bivššihit: # BEAGASJ_IV
#    bivššihit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: bivššihan
    bivššihit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: bivššiha
    bivššihit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: bivššihit
    bivššihit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: bivššiheigga
#    bivššihit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: bivššiheiddet
    bivššihit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [bivššihe, bivššihedje]
#    bivššihit+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: bivššit
#    bivššihit+V+IV+Imprt+Pl3: bivššihehkoset
#    bivššihit+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Du1: bivššihivččiime
    bivššihit+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Pl3: bivššihivčče
    bivššihit+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [bivššiheš, bivššiheaš, bivššiheažžá]
    bivššihit+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Pl3: bivššihežžet
    bivššihit+V+IV+Ger: bivššihettiin
    bivššihit+V+IV+PrfPrc: bivššihan
    bivššihit+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Inf: bivššihuvvot
#    bivššihit+V+IV+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: bivššihišgohten
    bivššihit+V+IV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Loc: [bivššiheamis, bivššiheames]

  Verb - bohraidit: # HURAI_IV
#    bohraidit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: bohraidan
    bohraidit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: bohraida
    bohraidit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: bohraidit
    bohraidit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: bohraideigga
#    bohraidit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: bohraideiddet
    bohraidit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [bohraide, bohraidedje]
#    bohraidit+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: [bohrait, bohraid]
#    bohraidit+V+IV+Imprt+Pl3: bohraidehkoset
#    bohraidit+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Du1: bohraidivččiime
    bohraidit+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Pl3: bohraidivčče
    bohraidit+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [bohraideš, bohraideaš, bohraideažžá]
    bohraidit+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Pl3: bohraidežžet
    bohraidit+V+IV+Ger: bohraidettiin
    bohraidit+V+IV+PrfPrc: bohraidan
    bohraidit+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Inf: bohraiduvvot
#    bohraidit+V+IV+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: bohraidišgohten
    bohraidit+V+IV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Loc: [bohraideamis, bohraideames]

  Verb - čohkánit: # LASSAN_IV
    čohkánit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čohkánan
    čohkánit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čohkána
    čohkánit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: čohkánit
    čohkánit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: čohkáneigga
    čohkánit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: čohkáneiddet
    čohkánit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [čohkáne, čohkánedje]
    čohkánit+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: čohkán
    čohkánit+V+IV+Imprt+Pl3: čohkánehkoset
    čohkánit+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Du1: čohkánivččiime
    čohkánit+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Pl3: čohkánivčče
    čohkánit+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [čohkáneš, čohkáneaš, čohkáneažžá]
    čohkánit+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Pl3: čohkánežžet
    čohkánit+V+IV+Ger: čohkánettiin
    čohkánit+V+IV+PrfPrc: čohkánan
    čohkánit+V+IV+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: čohkánišgohten
    čohkánit+V+IV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Loc: [čohkáneamis, čohkáneames]

  Verb - buovadit: # GEAGAT_TV
#    buovadit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: buovadan
    buovadit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: buovada
    buovadit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: buovadit
#    buovadit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: buovadeigga
#    buovadit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: buovadeiddet
    buovadit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [buovade, buovadedje]
#    buovadit+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: buovat
#    buovadit+V+TV+Imprt+Pl3: buovadehkoset
#    buovadit+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Du1: buovadivččiime
    buovadit+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Pl3: buovadivčče
    buovadit+V+TV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [buovadeš, buovadeaš, buovadeažžá]
    buovadit+V+TV+Pot+Prs+Pl3: buovadežžet
    buovadit+V+TV+Ger: buovadettiin
    buovadit+V+TV+PrfPrc: buovadan
    buovadit+V+TV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Inf: buovaduvvot
#    buovadit+V+TV+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: buovadišgohten
#    buovadit+V+TV+Der/easti+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: buovadesttiiga
    buovadit+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Loc: [buovadeamis, buovadeames]
